Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.080

Commission records as evidence.

Copies of the proceedings, records, and acts of the commission, when certified by the secretary of the commission and authenticated by the commission seal, shall be admissible in any court as prima facie evidence of the truth of the statements contained therein.

[ 1969 c 133 s 7.]